dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="b/ingo__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inga</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingu</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingo</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingu</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingo</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingom</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingo</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íng</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingám</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingá</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingách</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingá</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingami</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ingá</l>
        <r>ingo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cinz/ano__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ana</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>anu</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ano</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ane</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ano</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>anom</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ano</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>án</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>anam</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ana</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>anach</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ana</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>anami</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ana</l>
        <r>ano<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/usto__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usta</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustu</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usto</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uste</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usto</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustom</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usto</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úst</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustám</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustá</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustách</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustá</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustami</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ustá</l>
        <r>usto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pianiss/imo__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ima</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imu</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imo</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ime</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imo</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imom</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imo</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imám</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imá</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imách</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imá</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imami</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imá</l>
        <r>imo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="bingo"><i>b</i><par n="b/ingo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cinzano"><i>cinz</i><par n="cinz/ano__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gusto"><i>g</i><par n="g/usto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pianissimo"><i>pianiss</i><par n="pianiss/imo__n"/></e>
